Utah statutes.
62A-3-321.   Petition for injunctive relief when caretaker refuses to allow
services.
(1)  When a vulnerable adult is in need of protective services and the
caretaker refuses to allow the provision of those services, the division may
petition the court for injunctive relief prohibiting the caretaker from
interfering with the provision of protective services.
(2)  The division's petition under Subsection (1) shall allege facts
sufficient to show that the vulnerable adult is in need of protective
services, that the vulnerable adult either consents or lacks capacity to
consent to those services, and that the caretaker refuses to allow the
provision of those services or to order other appropriate relief.
(3)  The court may, on appropriate findings and conclusions in accordance with
Rule 65A, Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, issue an order enjoining the
caretaker from interfering with the provision of protective services.
(4)  The petition under Subsection (1) may be joined with a petition under
Section 62A-3-318 or Section 62A-3-320.
